Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
FENCES

Rules of Court

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(b)(12).

§664-21 Petition. [(a)] Any person
owning, leasing, or occupying land under an agreement with the owner or lessee,
who desires to fence the land, or who, having fenced the land, desires to
provide for the maintenance of the fence, may file a petition in the circuit
court of the circuit in which the land is situated praying for the hearing and
determination of the matter.

[(b)] The petition shall designate the land by
name or description, the location thereof, and the boundary or boundaries
desired to be fenced or the fence desired to be maintained; and shall designate
the adjoining land or lands and state the name or names of the owners, lessees,
and occupants thereof. Upon the filing of the petition, summons shall issue to
the adjoining owners, lessees, and occupants as in other proceedings before
circuit courts. [L 1931, c 101, §1; RL 1935, §3671; am L 1935, c 52, §1; am L
1941, c 219, §1; RL 1945, §10212; RL 1955, §234-20; HRS §664-21; am L 1972, c
90, §6(e)]

Cross References

Fences, other provisions, see §142-61.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next